Utah statutes.
31A-5-201.   Reservation and registration of corporate name.

The reservation, registration, and renewal of the corporate name of stock corporations and mutuals is governed by Sections 16-10a-402, 16-10a-403, and 31A-1-109.  The reservation and registration fees provided in Section 31A-3-103 apply.



Amended by Chapter 344, 1995 General Session

